Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-7306
Grievance register.

(1) A health carrier shall maintain in a grievance register
written records to document all grievances received during a calendar year.
A request for a review
of an adverse determination shall be processed in compliance with section
44-7308 but not considered a grievance for purposes of the grievance register
unless such request includes a written grievance. For
each grievance required to be recorded in the grievance register, the grievance
register shall contain, at a minimum, the following information:

(a) A general description of the reason for the grievance;

(b) Date received;

(c) Date of each review or hearing;

(d) Resolution of the grievance;

(e) Date of resolution; and

(f) Name of the covered person for whom the grievance was
filed.

(2) The grievance register shall be maintained in a manner
that is reasonably clear and accessible to the director. A grievance register
maintained by a health maintenance organization shall also be accessible to
the Department of Health and Human Services.

(3) A health carrier shall retain the grievance register compiled
for a calendar year for the longer of three years or until the director has
adopted a final report of an examination that contains a review of the grievance
register for that calendar year.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 71;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 201;

Laws 2013, LB147, § 19.